Idaho, session 2025, H0115.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 72-433, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-433. SUBMISSION OF INJURED EMPLOYEE TO MEDICAL EXAMINATION OR
PHYSICAL REHABILITATION. (1) After an injury or contraction of an occu-
pational disease and during the period of disability the employee, if
requested by the employer or ordered by the commission, shall submit himself
for examination at reasonable times and places to a duly qualified physician
or surgeon. The employee shall be reimbursed for his expenses of necessary
travel and subsistence in submitting himself for any such examination and
for loss of wages, if any. For purposes of this section, the reimbursement
for loss of wages shall be at the employee's then current rate of pay if the
employee is then working; otherwise, such reimbursement shall be at the
total temporary disability rate. Reimbursement for travel expenses, if the
employee utilizes a private vehicle, shall be at the mileage rate allowed by
the state board of examiners for state employees; provided, however, that
the employee shall not be reimbursed for the first fifteen (15) miles of any
round trip, nor for traveling any round trip distance of fifteen (15) miles
or less. Such distance shall be calculated by the shortest practical route
of travel.
(2) The employee shall have the right to have a physician or surgeon
designated and paid by himself present at an examination by a physician or
surgeon so designated by the employer. Such right, however, shall not be
construed to deny the employer's designated physician or surgeon the right
to visit the injured employee during reasonable times and under all reason-
able conditions during disability. The employee and the examining physician
shall have the right to have an audio recording of any examination, but may
have a video recording only if the examining physician and the employee con-
sent. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the testing por-
tion of psychological, neuropsychological, or psychiatric examinations.
(3) At any time after injury, if an injured employee be sent to a facil-
ity approved by the commission for physical or vocational rehabilitation,
the employee shall be furnished by the employer reasonable travel accommo-
dations to and from such facility and if the injured employee is an outpa-
tient in a physical rehabilitation facility, he shall be paid daily subsis-
tence as the commission may authorize to cover reasonable expenses of board,
lodging and transportation. Reimbursement for transportation expense, if
the employee utilizes a private vehicle, shall be at the mileage rate allowed


by the state board of examiners for state employees; provided however, that
the employee shall not be reimbursed for the first fifteen (15) miles of any
round trip, nor for traveling any round trip distance of fifteen (15) miles
or less. Such distance shall be calculated by the shortest practical route
of travel.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.